Utah statutes.
26-6-5.   Willful introduction of communicable disease a misdemeanor.

Any person who willfully or knowingly introduces any communicable or infectious disease into any county, municipality, or community is guilty of a class A misdemeanor, except as provided in Section 76-10-1309.

